Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 11
APPLICABILITY OF ARTICLE

7-80-1101. Application to limited liability companies formed prior to July 1, 1994.

A limited liability company formed under this article prior to July 1, 1994, shall be governed by the provisions of this article.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1465, § 200, effective July 1, 2004.)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added, p. 725, § 34, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1465, § 200, effective July 1.